Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-280
Public lands; improvements; contracts to sell authorized.

All contracts, promises, assumpsits or undertakings, either written or verbal, which shall be made in good faith and without fraud, collusion or circumvention, for sale, purchase or payment of improvements made on the lands owned by the government of the United States shall be deemed valid in law or equity, and may be sued for and recovered as in other contracts.

R.S.1866, c. 24, § 1, p. 186;

R.S.1913, § 6248;

C.S.1922, § 5647;

C.S.1929, § 76-253;

R.S.1943, § 76-280.